Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.010

Creation under general corporation laws authorized.

Organizations to provide development credit are authorized to be created under the general corporation laws of the state, with all of the powers, privileges and immunities conferred on corporations by such laws.

[ 1959 c 213 s 1.]